Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1958
Quality scale rating; application; assignment of rating.

(1) Quality rating criteria shall be used as provided in this section to assign a quality scale rating to each applicable child care or early childhood education program if the program applies under section 71-1957 to participate in the quality rating and improvement system developed pursuant to section 71-1955.

(2) Licensure under the Child Care Licensing Act for a program which serves children from birth to kindergarten-entrance age shall be sufficient criteria to be rated at step one.

(3) Meeting criteria established by the State Department of Education for a prekindergarten service or prekindergarten program established pursuant to section 79-1104 and reporting to the Nebraska Early Childhood Professional Record System created under section 71-1962 shall be sufficient criteria to be rated at step three.

(4) Meeting performance standards required by the federal government for a federal Head Start program or Early Head Start program and reporting to the Nebraska Early Childhood Professional Record System created under section 71-1962 shall be sufficient criteria to be rated at step three.

(5) Accreditation by a nationally recognized accrediting body approved by the State Department of Education and reporting to the Nebraska Early Childhood Professional Record System created under section 71-1962 shall be sufficient criteria to be rated at step three.

(6) A participating applicable child care or early childhood education program operating under a provisional license shall have a quality scale rating at step one even if it meets other quality rating criteria. A participating applicable child care or early childhood education program in good standing operating under a provisional license due to a change in license type may be rated above step one. If a participating applicable child care or early childhood education program is at a quality scale rating higher than step one and the program's license is placed on disciplinary limitation, probation, or suspension, such program shall have its quality scale rating changed to step one. If an applicable child care or early childhood education program's license is revoked, the program is not eligible to participate in or receive a quality scale rating under the quality rating and improvement system until the program has an operating license which is in full force and effect.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB351, § 1.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.